apertium-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="/esse__vbser">
      <e><p><l>esse</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esse</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>
      <e><p><l>essendu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>essendu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>sò</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sè</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hè</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ghjè</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>semu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>simu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sete</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sò</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sia</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sia</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sia</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sii</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>siamu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>siate</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sianu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      
      <e><p><l>fui</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fuste</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fubbe</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fuimu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fustete</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>funi</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>funu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>seraghju</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>serai</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>serà</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sarà</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>seremu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>saremu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>serete</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>seranu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>saranu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>era</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ghjera</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eri</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>era</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ghjera</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fù</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eramu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erate</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eranu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>erani</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ghjeranu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p><l>fussi</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fussi</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fussi</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fusse</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fusse</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fusse</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fussimu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fussite</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fussinu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      
      <e><p><l>saria</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>saristi</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>saria</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sariami</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sariamu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sariati</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sariani</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sarianu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>sarebbe</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>serebbe</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>stat</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="esse"><i></i><par n="/esse__vbser"/></e>
